Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. Generally

§ 31-18-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

“Authority” means a document issued under this act by the department, granting intrastate authority to a person to operate a motor vehicle as a motor carrier transporting persons or property;

“Commercial vehicle” means any vehicle or vehicle combination used, designed or maintained for transportation of persons for hire, compensation or profit, or designed or used primarily for the transportation of property for gain or profit and shall include, but not be limited to:

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 183, § 2.

(D)

With respect to interstate operation:

Any vehicle engaged in transporting of persons or property, having a gross vehicle weight rating, gross combination weight rating, gross vehicle weight or gross combination weight of ten thousand one (10,001) pounds or more;

Any vehicle transporting eight (8) or more passengers, including the driver, for compensation;

Any vehicle transporting sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver, without compensation;

Any vehicle requiring a hazardous materials placard; or

Any power unit having three (3) or more axles regardless of weight.

(E)

With respect to intrastate operation:

Any vehicle engaged in transporting of persons or property, having a gross vehicle weight rating, gross combination weight rating, gross vehicle weight or gross combination weight of twenty-six thousand one (26,001) pounds or more;

Any vehicle transporting eight (8) or more passengers, including the driver, for compensation;

Any vehicle transporting sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver, without compensation;

Any vehicle requiring a hazardous materials placard;

A power unit having two (2) axles and a gross vehicle weight or registered gross vehicle weight exceeding twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds;

A power unit having three (3) or more axles regardless of weight; or

Is used in combination when the weight of such combination exceeds twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds of gross vehicle weight.

“Compensation” means money or other recompense given, either directly or indirectly, for the transportation of persons or property by a motor carrier;

“Department” means the department of transportation;

and (vii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

“Gross vehicle weight” means as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(vii);

“Highway” means any road, street or way, whether on public or private property, open to public travel of any kind in Wyoming. For purposes of this paragraph, “open to public travel” means that the road section is available, except during scheduled periods, extreme weather or emergency conditions, passable by four-wheel standard passenger cars and open to the general public for use without restrictive gates, prohibitive signs or regulation other than restriction based on size, weight or class of registration. Toll plazas of public toll roads are not considered restrictive gates;

“Motor carrier” or “carrier” means a contract, private or interstate commercial vehicle operating on highways as hereafter defined:

“Contract motor carrier” means any person engaged in the intrastate or interstate transportation of persons or property by motor vehicle on highways for compensation;

and (C) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

(D)

“Private motor carrier” means any person engaged in business and operating a vehicle which has a gross vehicle weight, gross vehicle weight rating, gross combination weight or gross combination weight rating exceeding twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds operating intrastate or has a gross vehicle weight, gross vehicle weight rating, gross combination weight or gross combination weight rating exceeding ten thousand (10,000) pounds operating interstate who, without compensation, transports over highways his employees or property of which the person is the owner, lessee or bailee, used in the furtherance of any commercial enterprise including transporting placardable amounts of hazardous materials or operating a vehicle designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver. As used in this paragraph “commercial enterprise” means activities of those persons engaged in the exchange, purchase or selling of commodities or rendering a service in related financial transactions;

(E)

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

(F)

“Interstate motor carrier” means any person engaged in the transportation of person or property by motor vehicle from one (1) state to another for compensation, including locations outside of the United States.

“Motor vehicle” means every self-propelled vehicle intended primarily for use and operation on highways;

through (xvi) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

“State highway” means any highway now or subsequently designated as a state highway by the state transportation commission;

“Trailer” means a vehicle without propelling power designed to be drawn by a motor vehicle. The term includes the following vehicles as hereafter defined:

“House trailer” means a trailer designed, constructed and equipped as a dwelling place, living abode or sleeping place, either permanently or temporarily, and equipped for use as a conveyance on highways;

“Semitrailer” means every vehicle of a trailer type not equipped with propelling power so designed for carrying property and used in conjunction with a motor vehicle that some part of its weight and that of its load rests upon or is carried by another vehicle;

“Utility trailer” means any trailer less than six thousand (6,000) pounds gross vehicle weight ordinarily pulled by or attached to a motor vehicle.

“This act” means W.S.

31-18-101

through

31-18-903

;

“Intrastate” means the transportation of persons or property between points within Wyoming;

“Gross combination weight rating” means as defined in W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xxi);

“Gross vehicle weight rating” means as defined in W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xxii).

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

37-8-101

; Laws 1987, ch. 150, § 2; 1989, ch. 129, §§ 1, 3; 1991, ch. 241, §§ 3, 4; 1993, ch. 68, § 3; 1998, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2009, ch. 183, §§ 1, 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed (a)(iii)(A), which read: “A power unit having two (2) axles and a gross vehicle weight or registered gross vehicle weight exceeding twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds”; repealed (a)(iii)(B), which read: “A power unit having three (3) or more axles regardless of weight; or”; repealed (a)(iii)(C), which read: “Is used in combination when the weight of such combination exceeds twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds of gross vehicle weight”; added (a)(iii)(D) and (a)(iii)(E); in (a)(ix), in the first sentence substituted “street or way, whether on public or private property, open to public travel” for “thoroughfare or public way” and added the second and third sentences; in (a)(x), inserted “or interstate” preceding “commercial vehicle” and deleted “state” before “highways”; in (a)(x)(A), inserted “or interstate” following “intrastate” and deleted “state” before “highways”; in (a)(x)(D), in the first sentence, inserted “gross vehicle weight rating, gross combination weight or gross combination weight rating” following “gross vehicle weight”, inserted “operating intrastate or has a gross vehicle weight, gross vehicle weight rating, gross combination weight or gross combination weight rating exceeding ten thousand (10,000) pounds operating interstate” following “twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds”, substituted “transports over highways” for “transports intrastate over state highways”, and added “including transporting placardable amounts of hazardous materials or operating a vehicle designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver” at the end; added (a)(x)(F); and added (a)(xxi) and (a)(xxii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Nature of goods. —

Wholesale grocery company delivering goods to merchants along routes on which it transacted business, at wholesale prices plus transportation charge, was a private carrier and not in the transportation business, and that it charged for delivering its own goods was immaterial, as the goods transported were not “property of other.” Russell v. Walter Schultz Wholesale Grocery Co., 51 Wyo. 125, 64 P.2d 610,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1937).

Construction of ordinance. —

Ordinance regulating motor caravans and exacting fee did not apply to new automobiles hauled on trailer-truck which was only 42 feet long, in view of existing conditions, legislation, court decisions and meaning of “caravan.” Western Auto Transps. v. Cheyenne, 57 Wyo. 351, 118 P.2d 761,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1941).

Amount of fee. —

Fee fixed in ordinance for transporting motor caravans through city, to be lawful (if within power of municipality to exact under state law and if laws of congress do not forbid), though no nicety in calculation is required, should be confined to and commensurate with expenses incidental to regulation. Western Auto Transps. v. Cheyenne, 57 Wyo. 351, 118 P.2d 761,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1941).

Effect of motor carrier's using facilities not its own. —

The fact that a motor carrier purposes to use freight handling facilities, etc., not its own, does not prevent its “holding itself out” to the public, within the meaning of former subparagraph (a)(x)(E), as an instrumentality which transports freight over regular routes with fixed termini and as such comes within the definition of “common motor carrier” under this section. Application of Union Pac. Motor Freight Co., 72 Wyo. 298, 264 P.2d 771,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1953).

Section should be viewed in light of designation contained in art. 10, § 7, Wyo. Const.,

concerning what corporations are to be regarded as common carriers, in order to determine status of applicant as a common motor carrier. Application of Union Pac. Motor Freight Co., 72 Wyo. 298, 264 P.2d 771,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1953).

Applied

in

Good v. Reliance Ins. Co., 598 F. Supp. 332, 1984 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 21521 (D. Wyo. 1984); V-1 Oil Co. v. Means, 94 F.3d 1420, 1996 U.S. App. LEXIS 21933 (10th Cir. 1996).

Stated

in

White v. L.L. Smith Trucking, 742 P.2d 1286,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 512

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

State Bd. of Equalization v. Stanolind Oil & Gas Co., 54 Wyo. 521, 94 P.2d 147,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1939).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Public Service Commission and Motor Carriers,” see 18 Wyo. L.J. 279 (1964).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Persons engaged in business of renting motor vehicle without drivers as subject to regulation as carrier, 7 ALR2d 456, 60 ALR4th 784.

Ambulance as common carrier, making operator liable for injuries to person being transported, 21 ALR2d 910, 68 ALR4th 14.

Car pool or “share-the-expense” arrangement as subjecting vehicle operator to regulations applicable to carriers, 51 ALR2d 1193.

Ferry operator as common carrier with respect to motor vehicles and occupants thereof, 69 ALR2d 1008.

§ 31-18-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1, related the regulation of common motor carriers.

§ 31-18-103.
Exemptions.

The provisions contained in W.S.

31-18-104

,

31-18-209

,

31-18-301

and

31-18-304

do not apply to:

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 183, § 2.

Intrastate transportation on his own motor vehicle or combination of vehicles by any farmer or rancher, or the employee of a farmer or rancher exclusively in his service, transporting produce or commodities for his own use to and from his farm or ranch;

The exchange of intrastate transportation in their own motor vehicles, or combination of vehicles by farmers or ranchers, or the employees of farmers or ranchers exclusively in their service, when the exchange is between farmers or ranchers, or their employees, in the immediate community;

The exclusive noncommercial transportation of children to and from school;

The transportation of sick, injured or deceased persons by ambulance or hearse;

Transportation by motor vehicle when the motor vehicle is owned or operated by the United States, the state of Wyoming or any subdivision thereof;

Noncommercial vehicles engaged in the exclusive transportation of the United States mail;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 183, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

The intrastate transportation of livestock for show, performance or competition for noncommercial purposes.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

37-8-103

; Laws 1989, ch. 129, § 1; 1991, ch. 8, § 1; 1993, ch. 68, § 3; 1994, ch. 33, § 1; 1998, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 183, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 97, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 32, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed (a)(i), which read: “Motor carriers operating wholly within the confines of any Wyoming municipality”; repealed (a)(ii), which read: “Motor carriers transporting persons or property solely between a Wyoming municipality and airports considered adjacent thereto”; repealed (a)(iii), which read: “Motor carriers operating wholly within the confines of any highway construction project. Any operation on the highway outside of the actual construction site is not exempt”; inserted “intrastate” preceding “transportation” in (a)(iv) and (a)(v); inserted “noncommercial” preceding “transportation” in (a)(vi); substituted “Noncommercial vehicles” for “Motor carriers” in (a)(ix); and repealed (a)(xi), which read: “Transportation by motor vehicle on nonstate highways.”

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “eighty thousand (80,000)” for “fifty-five thousand (55,000)” in (a)(iv) and (a)(v).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(iv) and (v), deleted “having a gross vehicle weight of less than eighty thousand (80,000) pounds” following “combination of vehicles.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2017, ch. 97 , § 2, provides: "The department of transportation shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this act on or before July 1, 2017."

Laws 2018, ch. 32, § 2, provides: "On or before July 1, 2018, the department of transportation shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this act."

Highway regulations. —

State could regulate or prohibit use of highway only for promotion of safety, peace and general welfare. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Applied

in

V-1 Oil Co. v. Means, 94 F.3d 1420, 1996 U.S. App. LEXIS 21933 (10th Cir. 1996).

Cited

in

Salt Creek Transp. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 37 Wyo. 488, 263 P. 621,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1928).

§ 31-18-104.
Powers and duties of the department.

The department shall:

Supervise and regulate the operations of motor carriers to:

Preserve the safety of the highways;

and (C) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

Issue, refuse to issue or suspend the:

Authority to operate as a contract or private motor carrier; or

Commercial vehicle registration.

and (v) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

Promulgate and enforce rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out this act;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

Make and enforce rules of procedure for holding hearings including fixing reasonable fees for filing complaints and other pleadings subject to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Exercise such other powers as are reasonably necessary to carry out and enforce this act.

The department may initiate appropriate civil proceedings in the courts of this state to enforce and cause to be prosecuted criminal violations of this act, or of orders, rules or regulations. The district and county and prosecuting attorneys of this state shall prosecute all criminal violations. Other persons affected by violations of this act or the orders, rules or regulations of the department, may seek redress by appropriate remedy in the courts of this state or upon proper complaint or application to the department. The department may revoke any authority upon conviction of a carrier of any violation under W.S. 31-18-701(a) or after notice and hearing upon good cause shown.

through (e) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-8-104; Laws 1987, ch. 150, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, §§ 3, 4; 1993, ch. 68, § 3; 1998, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; 2020 ch. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, designated former (a)(iii) as the introductory language of (a)(iii) and (a)(iii)(A); in the introductory language of (a)(iii) added “or suspend the” and made related changes; and added (a)(iii)(B) and made related changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-18-101(a)(xix).

No evidence of competition. —

Contract carrier, seeking common-carrier rate under subsection (a)(ii), unable to produce evidence that any common carriers were actually competing for his hauls. See White v. L. L . Smith Trucking, 742 P.2d 1286,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 512

(Wyo. 1987) (decided under former § 37-8-104).